Utah statutes.
53C-2-411.   Unitization of mineral leases.

(1)  Mineral lessees, upon prior written authorization from the director, may commit leased trust lands to unit, cooperative, or other plans of development with other lands.

(2)  The director may, with the consent of the mineral lessee, modify any term of a mineral lease for lands that are committed to a unit, cooperative, or other plan of development.

(3)  Production allocated to leased trust lands under the terms of a unit, cooperative, or other plan of development shall be considered produced from the leased lands whether or not the point of production is located on the leased trust lands.



Enacted by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

